Utah statutes.
3-1-30.   Authorization for merger or consolidation with other associations or corporations -- Laws governing surviving or new corporation.

(1)  Pursuant to a plan approved under this chapter, an agricultural cooperative association may merge or consolidate with:

(a)  one or more agricultural cooperative associations;

(b)  one or more domestic corporations governed by:

(i)  Title 16, Chapter 10a, Utah Revised Business Corporation Act; or

(ii)  Title 16, Chapter 6a, Utah Revised Nonprofit Corporation Act; or

(c)  any combination of associations or corporations referred to in Subsection (1)(a) or (b).

(2)  The surviving or new corporation shall be governed by:

(a)  the Uniform Agricultural Cooperative Association Act; or

(b)  Title 16, Chapter 6a, Utah Revised Nonprofit Corporation Act.



Amended by Chapter 300, 2000 General Session

